Utah statutes.
53-6-203.   Applicants for admission to training programs or for
certification examination -- Requirements.
(1)  Before being accepted for admission to the training programs conducted by
a certified academy, and before being allowed to take a certification
examination, each applicant for admission or certification examination shall
meet the following requirements:
(a)  be a United States citizen;
(b)  be at least 21 years old at the time of appointment as a peace officer;
(c)  be a high school graduate or furnish evidence of successful completion of
an examination indicating an equivalent achievement;
(d)  have not been convicted of a crime for which the applicant could have
been punished by imprisonment in a federal penitentiary or by imprisonment in
the penitentiary of this or another state;
(e)  have demonstrated good moral character, as determined by a background
investigation; and
(f)  be free of any physical, emotional, or mental condition that might
adversely affect the performance of his duty as a peace officer.
(2) (a)  An application for admission to a training program shall be
accompanied by a criminal history background check of local, state, and
national criminal history files and a background investigation.
(b)  The costs of the background check and investigation shall be borne by the
applicant or the applicant's employing agency.
(i)  Conviction of any offense not serious enough to be covered under
Subsection (1)(d), involving dishonesty, unlawful sexual conduct, physical
violence, or the unlawful use, sale, or possession for sale of a controlled
substance is an indication that an applicant may not be of good moral
character and may be grounds for denial of admission to a training program or
refusal to take a certification examination.
(ii)  An applicant may be admitted to a training program provisionally,
pending completion of any background check or investigation required by this
subsection.
(3) (a)  Notwithstanding any expungement statute or rule of any other
jurisdiction, any conviction obtained in this state or other jurisdiction,
including a conviction that has been expunged, dismissed, or treated in a
similar manner to either of these procedures, may be considered for purposes
of this section.
(b)  This provision applies to convictions entered both before and after the
effective date of this section.
(4)  Any background check or background investigation performed pursuant to
the requirements of this section shall be to determine eligibility for
admission to training programs or qualification for certification examinations
and may not be used as a replacement for any background investigations that
may be required of an employing agency.
